lib/dict/lt.aff
SFX Q èias    tëlesniuosiuose èias
SFX Q us      ëlesnieji       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniøjø       us
SFX Q us      ëlesniesiems    us
SFX Q us      ëlesniuosius    us
SFX Q us      ëlesniaisiais   us
SFX Q us      ëlesniuosiuose  us
SFX Q as      ëlesniosioms    [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniàsias     [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniosiomis   [^i]as
SFX Q as      ëlesniosiose    [^i]as
SFX Q ias     ëlesniosioms    [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniàsias     [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniosiomis   [^èþ]ias
SFX Q ias     ëlesniosiose    [^èþ]ias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniosioms   èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniàsias    èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniosiomis  èias
SFX Q èias    tëlesniosiose   èias
SFX Q us      ëlesniosioms    us
SFX Q us      ëlesniàsias     us
SFX Q us      ëlesniosiomis   us
SFX Q us      ëlesniosiose    us
SFX Q as      iausias         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausio          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiam         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausià          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiu          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiame        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausias        das
SFX Q as      þiausio         das
SFX Q as      þiausiam        das
SFX Q as      þiausià         das
SFX Q as      þiausiu         das
SFX Q as      þiausiame       das
SFX Q s       usias           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usio            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiam           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usià            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiu            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiame          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausias        tas
SFX Q tas     èiausio         tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiam        tas
SFX Q tas     èiausià         tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiu         tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiame       tas
SFX Q us      iausias         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausio          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiam         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausià          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiu          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiame        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausias        dus
SFX Q us      þiausio         dus
SFX Q us      þiausiam        dus
SFX Q us      þiausià         dus
SFX Q us      þiausiu         dus
SFX Q us      þiausiame       dus
SFX Q us      ausias          jus
SFX Q us      ausio           jus
SFX Q us      ausiam          jus
SFX Q us      ausià           jus
SFX Q us      ausiu           jus
SFX Q us      ausiame         jus
SFX Q tus     èiausias        tus
SFX Q tus     èiausio         tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiam        tus
SFX Q tus     èiausià         tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiu         tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiame       tus
SFX Q as      iausia          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausios         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiai         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausioje        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausia         das
SFX Q as      þiausios        das
SFX Q as      þiausiai        das
SFX Q as      þiausioje       das
SFX Q s       usia            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usios           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiai           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usioje          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausia         tas
SFX Q tas     èiausios        tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiai        tas
SFX Q tas     èiausioje       tas
SFX Q us      iausia          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausios         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiai         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausioje        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausia         dus
SFX Q us      þiausios        dus
SFX Q us      þiausiai        dus
SFX Q us      þiausioje       dus
SFX Q us      ausia           jus
SFX Q us      ausios          jus
SFX Q us      ausiai          jus
SFX Q us      ausioje         jus
SFX Q tus     èiausia         tus
SFX Q tus     èiausios        tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiai        tus
SFX Q tus     èiausioje       tus
SFX Q as      iausi           [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiø          [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiems        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausius         [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiais        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuose       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausi          das
SFX Q as      þiausiø         das
SFX Q as      þiausiems       das
SFX Q as      þiausius        das
SFX Q as      þiausiais       das
SFX Q as      þiausiuose      das
SFX Q s       usi             [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiø            [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiems          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usius           [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiais          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuose         [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausi          tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiø         tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiems       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausius        tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiais       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiuose      tas
SFX Q us      iausi           [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiø          [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiems        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausius         [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiais        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuose       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausi          dus
SFX Q us      þiausiø         dus
SFX Q us      þiausiems       dus
SFX Q us      þiausius        dus
SFX Q us      þiausiais       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiuose      dus
SFX Q us      ausi            jus
SFX Q us      ausiø           jus
SFX Q us      ausiems         jus
SFX Q us      ausius          jus
SFX Q us      ausiais         jus
SFX Q us      ausiuose        jus
SFX Q tus     èiausi          tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiø         tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiems       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausius        tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiais       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiuose      tus
SFX Q as      iausioms        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiomis       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiose        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausioms       das
SFX Q as      þiausiomis      das
SFX Q as      þiausiose       das
SFX Q s       usioms          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiomis         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiose          [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausioms       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiomis      tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiose       tas
SFX Q us      iausioms        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiomis       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiose        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausioms       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiomis      dus
SFX Q us      þiausiose       dus
SFX Q us      ausioms         jus
SFX Q us      ausiomis        jus
SFX Q us      ausiose         jus
SFX Q tus     èiausioms       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiomis      tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiose       tus
SFX Q as      iausiasis       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiojo        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajam       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiàjá        [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiuoju       [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      iausiajame      [^dijt]as
SFX Q as      þiausiasis      das
SFX Q as      þiausiojo       das
SFX Q as      þiausiajam      das
SFX Q as      þiausiàjá       das
SFX Q as      þiausiuoju      das
SFX Q as      þiausiajame     das
SFX Q s       usiasis         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiojo          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajam         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiàjá          [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiuoju         [ij]as
SFX Q s       usiajame        [ij]as
SFX Q tas     èiausiasis      tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiojo       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiajam      tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiàjá       tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiuoju      tas
SFX Q tas     èiausiajame     tas
SFX Q us      iausiasis       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiojo        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajam       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiàjá        [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiuoju       [^djt]us
SFX Q us      iausiajame      [^djt]us
SFX Q us      þiausiasis      dus
SFX Q us      þiausiojo       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiajam      dus
SFX Q us      þiausiàjá       dus
SFX Q us      þiausiuoju      dus
SFX Q us      þiausiajame     dus
SFX Q us      ausiasis        jus
SFX Q us      ausiojo         jus
SFX Q us      ausiajam        jus
SFX Q us      ausiàjá         jus
SFX Q us      ausiuoju        jus
SFX Q us      ausiajame       jus
SFX Q tus     èiausiasis      tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiojo       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiajam      tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiàjá       tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiuoju      tus
SFX Q tus     èiausiajame     tus
SFX Q as      iausioji        [^dijt]as
