lib/dict/lt.dic
abipusiğkas/BNQ
afganiğkas/BNQ
ağigaliğkas/BNQ
aitrus/BNQ
akivaizdus/BNQ
ğaknytas/BNQ
akuotuotas/BNQ
ğalimas/BNQ
alogiğkas/BNQ
şalzganas/BNQ
analitiğkas/BNQ
anglingas/BNQ
ankğtëtas/BNQ
antşmogiğkas/BNQ
apgaulingas/BNQ
apkûnus/BNQ
apsukrus/BNQ
ardus/BNQ
arogantiğkas/BNQ
asmeniğkas/BNQ
ateistiğkas/BNQ
atkampus/BNQ
atğlijas/BNQ
atsakingas/BNQ
atstus/BNQ
audringas/BNQ
ğaukğtiğkas/BNQ
automatiğkas/BNQ
bailus/BNQ
baltarusiğkas/BNQ
barningas/BNQ
bavariğkas/BNQ
bejëgiğkas/BNQ
besàlygiğkas/BNQ
birus/BNQ
blankus/BNQ
bosniğkas/BNQ
brizgus/BNQ
bukaprotiğkas/BNQ
choleriğkas/BNQ
dabnus/BNQ
dairus/BNQ
dantytas/BNQ
darşiğkas/BNQ
daugus/BNQ
degutuotas/BNQ
derlus/BNQ
devynlinkas/BNQ
dievobaimingas/BNQ
dirsëtas/BNQ
dykas/BNQ
dokumentalus/BNQ
draikus/BNQ
draugus/BNQ
drikus/BNQ
drûşëtas/BNQ
druskuotas/BNQ
dulksnus/BNQ
duoniğkas/BNQ
dusulingas/BNQ
dvigubas/BNQ
şebras/BNQ
egzaltuotas/BNQ
eislus/BNQ
ekstravagantiğkas/BNQ
elgetiğkas/BNQ
şeminas/BNQ
şenklus/BNQ
eretiğkas/BQ
esmiğkas/BNQ
fanatiğkas/BNQ
fiziğkas/BNQ
gaidrus/BNQ
gaivaliğkas/BNQ
gağlus/BNQ
garbiniuotas/BNQ
gaubtas/BNQ
geidşiamas/BNQ
geluoniuotas/BNQ
gervinas/BNQ
gimtas/BNQ
gyslotas/BNQ
glaudus/BNQ
glodnas/BNQ
gobus/BNQ
graikğtus/BNQ
graşus/BNQ
griausmingas/BNQ
grynas/BNQ
grubus/BNQ
gumbuotas/BNQ
herojiğkas/BNQ
ğiauduotas/BNQ
şiburiuotas/BNQ
iğdrikas/BNQ
iğganus/BNQ
iğkilmingas/BNQ
ilgaamşiğkas/BNQ
iltëtas/BNQ
imunus/BNQ
informatyvus/BNQ
inteligentiğkas/BNQ
iğprağus/BNQ
iğrûgotas/BNQ
iğsklidus/BNQ
iğtikimas/BNQ
ğiurpulingas/BNQ
yliğkas/BNQ
jaunatviğkas/BNQ
jovaluotas/BNQ
juodbruvas/BNQ
kablus/BNQ
kalavijiğkas/BNQ
kalnuotas/BNQ
kalvus/BNQ
kanapëtas/BNQ
kapiliarus/BNQ
karoliuotas/BNQ
kaspinuotas/BNQ
kaupinas/BNQ
keleiviğkas/BNQ
kemsëtas/BNQ
kerğtingas/BNQ
ketveriopas/BNQ
kiesvas/BNQ
kiminuotas/BNQ
kislus/BNQ
klajokliğkas/BNQ
kliaudingas/BNQ
klostuotas/BNQ
knapus/BNQ
koherentiğkas/BNQ
koğmariğkas/BQ
konfidencialus/BNQ
kontrastingas/BNQ
koğëtas/BNQ
kraugeriğkas/BNQ
kremzlëtas/BNQ
kûrybingas/BNQ
krovus/BNQ
kubietiğkas/BNQ
kupstuotas/BNQ
kvalifikuotas/BNQ
álaidus/BNQ
laiptuotas/BNQ
lakoniğkas/BNQ
lapiğkas/BNQ
leduotas/BNQ
lengvapëdiğkas/BNQ
liberaliğkas/BNQ
lietingas/BNQ
linksmas/BNQ
şliuginas/BNQ
lygus/BNQ
lojalus/BNQ
ğlubas/BNQ
maşarağtiğkas/BNQ
maistingas/BNQ
malşus/BNQ
ámanus/BNQ
marus/BNQ
maunus/BNQ
medingas/BNQ
melagingas/BNQ
metaforiğkas/BNQ
miegûstas/BNQ
miglus/BNQ
miğlus/BNQ
mirtingas/BNQ
mëğluotas/BNQ
mokestingas/BNQ
moliuotas/BNQ
moralus/BNQ
mudrus/BNQ
ûmus/BNQ
naguotas/BNQ
nartus/BNQ
nağus/BNQ
negatyvus/BNQ
nelauktas/BNQ
nepagydomas/BNQ
nesuskaitomas/BNQ
niaukus/BNQ
ánirtingas/BNQ
nokus/BNQ
novatoriğkas/BNQ
nuodingas/BNQ
nuokalnus/BNQ
nuosaulus/BNQ
nuotakus/BNQ
odiğkas/BNQ
olandiğkas/BNQ
oranşiğkas/BNQ
ğovotas/BNQ
padaiguotas/BNQ
pagavus/BNQ
pagrástas/BNQ
pajëgus/BNQ
pakenèiamas/BNQ
palankus/BNQ
pamatuotas/BNQ
paplaiğotas/BNQ
paranormalus/BNQ
pasagiğkas/BNQ
pasikliautinas/BNQ
paslankus/BNQ
paástrişas/BNQ
patogus/BNQ
pavaldus/BNQ
pavydulingas/BNQ
pedantiğkas/BNQ
penkialinkas/BNQ
pûgotas/BNQ
pilkas/BNQ
pinklus/BNQ
pûkinas/BNQ
plitus/BNQ
polemiğkas/BNQ
pragaiğtingas/BNQ
pranağus/BNQ
preciziğkas/BNQ
prielankus/BNQ
prisiskaitëliğkas/BNQ
proporcionalus/BNQ
puknus/BNQ
putotas/BNQ
raistingas/BNQ
raudas/BNQ
regresyvus/BNQ
reprezentatyvus/BNQ
riğlus/BNQ
ryzgus/BNQ
rûstus/BNQ
saikingas/BNQ
sankibus/BNQ
savamoksliğkas/BNQ
sceniğkas/BNQ
septyneriopas/BNQ
şàsiğkas/BNQ
sistematiğkas/BNQ
skardingas/BNQ
áskypas/BNQ
skrituliğkas/BNQ
slankus/BNQ
slëpiningas/BNQ
smiltuotas/BNQ
snaudus/BNQ
spaliuotas/BNQ
spyruokliğkas/BNQ
sraunus/BNQ
staliniğkas/BNQ
stikliğkas/BNQ
studentiğkas/BNQ
suodşiuotas/BNQ
svarus/BNQ
taiklus/BNQ
tankus/BNQ
taukuotas/BNQ
teisus/BNQ
tibetietiğkas/BNQ
tipiğkas/BNQ
tolerantingas/BNQ
trapus/BNQ
triukğmingas/BNQ
tuklus/BNQ
tvirtapradiğkas/BNQ
şulsnus/BNQ
uolëtas/BNQ
ğutnus/BNQ
vaikuotas/BNQ
ávaizdus/BNQ
valiûkiğkas/BNQ
ğvankus/BNQ
varniğkas/BNQ
ğveicariğkas/BNQ
velëningas/BNQ
verğingas/BNQ
viduramşiğkas/BNQ
vieningas/BNQ
ávijas/BNQ
vingrus/BNQ
vislus/BNQ
vyşotas/BNQ
voratinkliğkas/BNQ
